District of Columbia statutes.
26-1401.30

Fees.

The Commissioner may establish fees for the filing of documents, the processing of applications, and other services provided by the Commissioner or the Department under this chapter.

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-308, § 230, 48 DCR 3244